Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1 DRIVERS' LICENSES
42-2-122. Department may cancel license - limited license for physical or mental limitations.

The department has the authority to cancel, deny, or deny the reissuance of any driver's or minor driver's license upon determining that the licensee was not entitled to the issuance for any of the following reasons:

Failure to give the required or correct information in an application, or commission of any fraud in making such application or in submitting any proof allowed under this section;

Inability to operate a motor vehicle because of physical or mental incompetence;

Permission of an unlawful or fraudulent use or conviction of misuse of license, titles, permits, or license plates;

That such license would have been subject to denial under the provisions of section 42-2-104;

Failure of the licensee to register in Colorado all vehicles owned by the licensee under the requirements of section 42-3-103;

The person is not lawfully present in the United States;

The person is not a resident of the state of Colorado;

The person has an outstanding judgment or warrant referred to in section 42-4-1709 (7) issued against such person; except that, as used in this paragraph (h), "judgment or warrant" shall not include any judgment or warrant reported to the department in violation of section 42-4-110.5 (2)(c).

Upon receipt of a judgment or warrant from a court clerk on or after September 1, 2000, the department shall send written notice to the person identified in the court order that such person is required to provide the department with proof that the judgment or warrant is no longer outstanding within thirty days after the date such notice is sent or such person's driver's license shall be canceled or any application for a new license shall be denied. Proof that the judgment or warrant is no longer outstanding shall be in the form of a certificate issued by the clerk of the court entering the judgment or issuing the warrant in a form approved by the executive director.

If acceptable proof is not received by the department within thirty days after notice was sent, the department shall cancel the driver's license or deny any application for a license of the person against whom the judgment was entered or the warrant was issued.

The general assembly finds that the department currently has record of a large number of outstanding judgments and warrants and that it does not know whether such judgments and warrants are still outstanding. All outstanding judgments and warrants that are in the department's records as of August 31, 2000, shall be deemed void for purposes of this section effective September 1, 2005.

Failure of the person to complete a level II alcohol and drug education and treatment program certified by the office of behavioral health in the department of human services pursuant to section 42-4-1301.3, as required by section 42-2-126 (4)(d)(II)(A) or 42-2-132 (2)(a)(II). The failure must be documented pursuant to section 42-2-144.

The department has the authority to cancel any driver's or minor driver's license if, subsequent to the issuance of such license, the department has authentic information that a condition developed or an act was committed which places such licensee in one of the categories for which cancellation is authorized.

(2.5) (a) Any person who has had a driver's or minor driver's license or driving privilege cancelled pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section who is receiving or has received therapy treatment for physical or mental incompetence or an evaluation for such incompetence through a rehabilitation provider or licensed physician certified by the department to provide rehabilitative driving instruction may receive a limited license with such limitations as the department deems necessary after consultation with and upon the recommendation of the rehabilitation provider or licensed physician.

Any person licensed pursuant to this subsection (2.5) shall be subject to the examination requirements set forth in section 42-2-111.

Rehabilitation providers and licensed physicians shall be subject to the provisions governing medical advice in section 42-2-112.

The department shall adopt rules as necessary to carry out this subsection (2.5).

Upon such cancellation, the licensee must surrender the license so cancelled to the department, and thereafter such licensee shall be entitled to a hearing by the department if such license is returned and if such request is made within thirty days from the date of such cancellation; except that a denial or cancellation under paragraph (h) or (i) of subsection (1) of this section shall be deemed to be final agency action for judicial review purposes under section 24-4-104, C.R.S. Such hearing, if requested, shall be held no later than thirty days from the date of such cancellation. Notification of such cancellation shall be given as provided in section 42-2-119.

Upon the holding of a hearing as provided in subsection (3) of this section or upon determination by the department, the license shall be returned if the licensee is able to prove that cancellation should not have been made. When the original cancellation is sustained by the department, such licensee may apply for and receive a new license whenever the licensee can show that the reason for the original cancellation no longer applies. The licensee may also appeal the decision of the department after the hearing to the district court as provided in section 42-2-135.

A licensee who has proved that cancellation should not have been made shall not be required to give proof of financial responsibility pursuant to article 7 of this title.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2130, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(2.5) added and (4) amended, p. 707, § 2, effective May 23.

L. 97:

(1)(e) added, p. 1001, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 98:

(1)(f) and (1)(g) added, p. 295, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) and (3) amended and (1)(h) added, p. 804, § 1, effective August 2; IP(1), (2), and (2.5)(a) amended, p. 1352, § 22, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2001:

(1)(i) added and (3) amended pp. 786, 787, §§ 2, 3, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

(1)(i) amended, p. 1921, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(4)(a) amended, p. 646, § 13, effective May 27.

L. 2008:

(1)(i) amended, p. 245, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(1)(i) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1178, § 100, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

IP(1) and (1)(i) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1257, § 19, effective May 25.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-119 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-2-122 was relocated to § 42-2-125.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2001 act enacting subsection (1)(i) and amending subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 229, Session Laws of Colorado 2001. For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

42-2-123. Suspending privileges of nonresidents and reporting convictions.

The privilege of driving a motor vehicle on the highways of this state given to a nonresident is subject to suspension or revocation by the department in like manner and for like cause as a driver's license may be suspended or revoked.

The department is further authorized, upon receiving a record of the conviction in this state of a nonresident driver of a motor vehicle of any offense under the motor vehicle laws of this state, to forward a certified copy of such record to the motor vehicle administrator in the state wherein the person so convicted is a resident.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2131, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-120 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-2-123 was relocated to § 42-2-127.

42-2-124. When court to report convictions.

Except as otherwise provided, whenever any person is convicted of any offense for which this article makes mandatory the revocation or suspension of the driver's or minor driver's license of such person by the department, the court in which such conviction is had shall require the offender to immediately surrender such driver's or minor driver's license or any instruction permit to the court at the time of conviction, and the court shall, not later than ten days after such conviction, forward the license to the department, together with a record of such conviction on the form prescribed by the department. Any person who does not immediately surrender such person's license or permit to the court commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense, unless such person swears or affirms under oath administered by the court and subject to the penalties of perjury that the license or permit has been lost, destroyed, or is not in said person's immediate possession. Any person who swears or affirms that the license or permit is not in the immediate possession of said person shall surrender said license or permit to the court within five days of the sworn or affirmed statement, and if not surrendered within such time, said person commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

Whenever the driver's history of any person shows that such driver is required to maintain financial responsibility for the future and is unable to show to the court that the driver is maintaining the required financial responsibility for the future, the court shall require the immediate surrender to it of the driver's, minor driver's, or temporary driver's license or any instruction permit held by such person, and the court, within forty-eight hours after receiving the license, shall forward the license to the department with the form prescribed by the department.

Every court having jurisdiction over offenses committed under this article or any other law of this state regulating the operation of motor vehicles on highways and every military authority having jurisdiction over offenses substantially the same as those set forth in section 42-2-127 (5) which occur on a federal military installation in this state shall forward to the department a record of the conviction of any person in said court or by said authority for a violation of any said laws not later than ten days after the day of sentencing for such conviction and may recommend the suspension or retention of the driver's, minor driver's, or temporary driver's license or any instruction permit of the person so convicted.

For the purposes of this section, the term "convicted" or "conviction" means a sentence imposed following a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, a verdict of guilty by the court or a jury, or an adjudication of a delinquency under title 19, C.R.S. The payment of a penalty assessment under the provisions of section 42-4-1701 shall also be considered a conviction if the summons states clearly the points to be assessed for that offense. Whenever suspension or revocation of a license is authorized or required for conviction of any offense under state law, a final finding of guilty of a violation of a municipal ordinance governing a substantially equivalent offense in a city, town, or city and county shall, for purposes of such suspension or revocation, be deemed and treated as a conviction of the corresponding offense under state law. A stay of sentence, pending appeal, shall not deprive the department of the authority to suspend, revoke, or deny a driver's or minor driver's license pending any final determination of a conviction on appeal.

An expungement of an adjudication of delinquency shall not result in a rescission of the revocation or suspension of the driving privilege unless said expungement is a result of a reversal of the adjudication on appeal.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2131, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(4) amended, p. 1538, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(4) amended, p. 1436, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1352, § 23, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2002:

(1)(a) and (4) amended, p. 1585, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(4) amended, p. 1131, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(3) and (4) amended, p. 646, § 14, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-121 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-2-124 was relocated to § 42-2-132.

Cross references:

For collateral attacks of traffic convictions, see §§ 42-4-1702 and 42-4-1708.

42-2-125. Mandatory revocation of license and permit.

The department shall immediately revoke the license or permit of any driver or minor driver upon receiving a record showing that the driver has:

Been convicted of vehicular homicide or vehicular assault as described in sections

18-3-106

and

18-3-205

, C.R.S., or of criminally negligent homicide as described in section

18-3-105

, C.R.S., while driving a motor vehicle;

Been convicted of driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of a controlled substance, as defined in section

18-18-102 (5)

, C.R.S.;

In the case of a driver twenty-one years of age or older, been convicted of an offense described in section

42-4-1301 (1)(a)

or (2)(a). Except as provided in section

42-2-132.5

, the period of revocation based upon this paragraph (b.5) shall be nine months. The provisions of this paragraph (b.5) shall not apply to a person whose driving privilege was revoked pursuant to section 42-2-126 (3)(a)(I) for a first offense based on the same driving incident.

Been convicted of any felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle was used;

Been convicted of failing to stop and render aid as required by section

42-4-1601

;

Been convicted of perjury in the first or second degree or the making of a false affidavit or statement under oath to the department under any law relating to the ownership or operation of a motor vehicle;

Been three times convicted of reckless driving of a motor vehicle for acts committed within a period of two years;

Been twice convicted of any combination of DUI, DUI per se, or DWAI for acts committed within a period of five years;

In the case of a minor driver, been convicted of DUI, DUI per se, or DWAI committed while such driver was under twenty-one years of age;

In the case of a minor driver, been convicted of UDD committed when such driver was under twenty-one years of age;

Been determined to be mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction and for whom a court has entered, pursuant to part 3 or part 4 of article 14 of title 15, C.R.S., or section

27-65-109 (4)

or

27-65-127

, C.R.S., an order specifically finding that the mental incompetency is of such a degree that the person is incapable of safely operating a motor vehicle;

Been convicted of DUI, DUI per se, or DWAI and has two previous convictions of any of those offenses. The department shall revoke the license of any driver for an indefinite period and only reissue it upon proof to the department that the driver has completed a level II alcohol and drug education and treatment program certified by the office of behavioral health in the department of human services pursuant to section

42-4-1301.3

and that the driver has demonstrated knowledge of the laws and driving ability through the regular motor vehicle testing process. The department shall not reissue the license in less than two years.

Been required to file and maintain proof of financial responsibility for the future as provided by section

42-4-1410

or article 7 of this title and who, at the time of a violation of any provision of this title, had not filed or was not maintaining such proof;

Repealed.

Been found to have knowingly and willfully left the scene of an accident involving a commercial motor vehicle driven by the person;

Been convicted of violating section

18-13-122 (3)

or

44-3-901 (1)(c)

or (1)(d) or any counterpart municipal charter or ordinance offense to such sections and having failed to complete an alcohol evaluation or assessment, an alcohol education program, or an alcohol treatment program ordered by the court in connection with such conviction; or

Been convicted of violating section

18-13-122 (3)

or

44-3-901 (1)(c)

or (1)(d) or any counterpart municipal charter or ordinance offense to such sections and has a previous conviction for such offenses;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (HB 09-1266), ch. 347, p. 1816, § 8, effective August 5, 2009.)

Been:

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (HB 09-1266), ch. 347, p. 1816, § 8, effective August 5, 2009.)

Convicted of, or has received a deferred judgment for, an offense described in section

18-4-409

or

18-4-503 (1)(c)

, C.R.S., or a comparable municipal charter or ordinance offense.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2007, p. 504

, § 3, effective July 1, 2007.)

Unless otherwise provided in this section, the period of revocation shall be not less than one year; except that the period of revocation based on paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (1) of this section involving a commercial motor vehicle transporting hazardous materials as defined under section

42-2-402 (7)

shall result in a revocation period of three years.

(2.3) (Deleted by amendment,

L. 2007, p. 504

, § 3, effective July 1, 2007.)

(2.4) After the expiration of the period of revocation pursuant to this section and any subsequently imposed periods of revocation, any person whose license is revoked under subparagraph (I) of paragraph (g) or paragraph (i) of subsection (1) of this section shall be required to have a restricted license pursuant to the provisions of section

42-2-132.5

.

(2.5) The period of revocation under paragraph (g.5) of subsection (1) of this section for a person who is less than twenty-one years of age at the time of the offense and who is convicted of driving with an alcohol content of at least 0.02 but not more than 0.05 under section

42-4-1301 (2)(d)

is as follows:

Except as provided in subsection (2.7) of this section, three months for a first offense;

Six months for a second offense;

One year for a third or subsequent offense.

(2.7) (a) A person whose license is revoked for a first offense under paragraph (g.5) of subsection (1) of this section may request that, in lieu of the three-month revocation, the person's license be revoked for a period of not less than thirty days, to be followed by a suspension period of such length that the total period of revocation and suspension equals three months. If the hearing officer approves such request, the hearing officer may grant such person a probationary license that may be used only for the reasons provided in section

42-2-127

(14)(a).

The hearing to consider a request under paragraph (a) of this subsection (2.7) may be held at the same time as the hearing held under subsection (4) of this section; except that a probationary license may not become effective until at least thirty days have elapsed since the beginning of the revocation period.

(2.8) Repealed.

Upon revoking the license of any person as required by this section, the department shall immediately notify the licensee as provided in section 42-2-119 (2). Where a minor driver's license is revoked under paragraph (m) of subsection (1) of this section, such revocation shall not run concurrently with any previous or subsequent suspension, revocation, cancellation, or denial that is provided for by law.

Upon receipt of the notice of revocation, the licensee or the licensee's attorney may request a hearing in writing, if the licensee has returned said license to the department in accordance with the provisions of section 42-2-133. The department, upon notice to the licensee, shall hold a hearing at the district office of the department closest to the residence of the licensee; except that, at the discretion of the department, all or part of the hearing may be conducted in real time, by telephone or other electronic means in accordance with section 42-1-218.5. The department shall hold the hearing not less than thirty days after receiving such license and request through a hearing commissioner appointed by the executive director of the department, which hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of section 24-4-105, C.R.S. After such hearing, the licensee may appeal the decision of the department to the district court as provided in section 42-2-135. Should a driver who has had his or her license revoked under this section be subsequently acquitted of such charge by a court of record, the department shall immediately, in any event not later than ten days after the receipt of such notice of acquittal, reinstate said license to the driver affected.

Except where more than one revocation occurs as a result of the same episode of driving, license revocations made pursuant to this section shall not run concurrently with any previous or subsequent revocation or denial in lieu of revocation which is provided for by law. Any revocation unused pursuant to this section shall not preclude other actions which the department is required to take pursuant to the provisions of this title, and unless otherwise provided by law, this subsection (5) shall not prohibit revocations from being served concurrently with any suspension or denial in lieu of suspension of driving privileges.

Any person who has a license revoked pursuant to paragraph (m) of subsection (1) of this section shall be subject to the following revocation periods:

After a first conviction and failure to complete an ordered evaluation, assessment, or program, three months;

After a second conviction, six months;

After any third or subsequent conviction, one year.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2007, p. 504

, § 3, effective July 1, 2007.)

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (HB 09-1266), ch. 347, p. 1816, § 8, effective August 5, 2009.)

If a suspension or revocation of a license is authorized or required for conviction of an offense under state law, a final finding of guilt for a violation of a municipal ordinance governing a substantially equivalent offense in a municipality, county, or another state for purposes of a suspension or revocation shall be deemed as a conviction of the corresponding offense under state law. A stay of sentence or a pending appeal shall not deprive the department of the authority to suspend, revoke, or deny a driver's license or minor driver's license pending a final determination of a conviction on appeal.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2133, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1)(m) amended, p. 314, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1)(j) amended, p. 1207, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1)(g) and (1)(i) amended and (1)(g.5), (2.5), and (2.7) added, p. 1460, §§ 3, 2, effective July 1; (1)(m) amended, p. 305, § 22, effective July 1; (1)(n) and (7) added and (3) amended, p. 1537, §§ 3, 4, effective July 1.

L. 98:

IP(2.5) amended, p. 173, § 2, effective April 6; (1)(k), (3), and (6) amended, p. 1434, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1)(n) amended, p. 391, § 2, effective July 1; (2.3) and (2.4) added, p. 1158, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(g) and (2.4) amended, p. 1075, § 2, effective July 1; IP(1), (1)(g)(II), (1)(g.5), (1)(k)(II), (3), and (7) amended, p. 1353, § 24, effective July 1, 2001; (6)(c)(II) added by revision, pp. 1353, 1362, §§ 24, 49.

L. 2001:

(4) amended, p. 553, § 3, effective May 23.

L. 2002:

(1)(i) amended, p. 1921, § 17, effective July 1; (1)(k) repealed, p. 1585, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(n) amended, p. 1905, § 5, effective July 1; (1)(o) and (2.8) added, pp. 1845, 1846, §§ 3, 5, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

IP(1)(o) amended and (8) added, p. 647, § 15, effective May 27.

L. 2007:

(1)(d), (1)(o), (2), (2.3), (2.8), (3), IP(6)(a), (6)(b), and (8) amended, p. 504, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(g), (1)(g.5), and (1)(i) amended, p. 245, § 7, effective July 1; (1)(b.5) added and (1)(g)(I) and (2) amended, p. 832, § 2, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2009:

(1)(m), (1)(n), (1)(o)(I), (3), (6)(a), and (7) amended, (HB 09-1266), ch. 347, p. 1816, § 8, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(1)(h) amended, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 807, § 85, effective April 29.

L. 2011:

(1)(i) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1179, § 101, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1631, § 88, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1)(b), (1)(g), and (1)(i) amended, (HB 13-1325), ch. 331, p. 1880, § 7, effective May 28.

L. 2014:

(1)(m) amended, (SB 14-129), ch. 387, p. 1939, § 11, effective June 6.

L. 2015:

IP(2.5) amended, (HB 15-1043), ch. 262, p. 997, § 6, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(2.8) repealed, (SB 16-065), ch. 277, p. 1143, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

IP(1) and (1)(i) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1257, § 20, effective May 25.

L. 2018:

(1)(m) amended, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1082, § 23, effective October 1.